Delaware, session 153, HB181.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF DELAWARE: Section 1. Amend Â§ 3719, Title 19 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Â§ 3719. Penalties. (a) An employer who violates or fails to comply with any requirement of this chapter, including failing to file reports as prescribed by the Department, failing to make contributions as required by this chapter, and failing to properly handle and remit wage deductions from employees to the Department, is deemed in violation of this chapter and is subject to a civil penalty of not less than $1,000 nor more than $5,000 for each violation. (a) An employer who violates or fails to comply with either Sections 3707 or 3708 of this Chapter is deemed in violation of this chapter and is subject to a civil penalty of not less than $1,000 nor more than $5,000 for each violation, effective immediately. An employer who violates or fails to comply with any requirement of this chapter, except Sections 3707 or 3708 shall be deemed in violation of this chapter and subject to a civil penalty of not less than $1,000 nor more than $5,000 for each violation, effective as of January 1, 2027. (b) An employer who discharges or in any manner discriminates against an employee because that employee has made a complaint or has given information to the Department under this chapter, or because the employee has caused to be instituted or is about to cause to be instituted any proceedings under this chapter, or has testified or is about to testify in any proceedings is deemed in violation of this chapter and is subject to a civil penalty of not less than $1,000 nor more than $5,000 for each violation. (c) (b) A civil penalty claim may be filed in any court of competent jurisdiction. (d) (c) Funds from any civil penalty under this chapter, including an overpayment penalty as authorized by Â§ 3712 of this title, must be deposited in the Fund. SYNOPSIS HB181 removed penalties for all violations of the Family and Medical Leave Insurance Program until January 29, 2029. The substitute revised this timeline to two years for some violations, making them effective January 1, 2027, and maintains violations for Â§ 3707 of the act-leave and employment protection and Â§ 3708 of the act-retaliatory personnel actions prohibited. For those employers who do not remit contribution collected from employees, as the Family and Medical Leave Insurance Program allows, this will be a violation considered wage theft under 19 Del. C Â§1102A(a)(3).